Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1469.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 9-500.49, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE9-500.49. Administrative review and approval; self-certification program; expedited approval; applicability; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, the legislative body of a city or town with a population of more than seventy-five thousand persons shall by ordinance do the following: 1. Authorize administrative personnel to review and approve site plans, development plans, land divisions, lot line adjustments, lot ties, preliminary plats, final plats and plat amendments without a public hearing. 2. Authorize administrative personnel to review and approve design review plans based on objective standards without a public hearing. 3. Allow at-risk submittals for certain on-site preliminary grading and drainage work or infrastructure. 4. Allow applicants with a history of compliance with building codes and regulations to be eligible for expedited permit review. B. Notwithstanding any other law, the legislative body of a city or town may by ordinance adopt a self-certification program allowing registered architects and professional engineers to certify and be responsible for compliance with all applicable ordinances and construction standards for projects that the ordinance identifies as being qualified for self-certification. C. Applications for a license pursuant to this section are subject to chapter 7, article 4 of this title. D. This section does not apply to any of the following: 1. Land in an area that is designated as a district of historical significance pursuant to section 9-462.01, subsection A, paragraph 10. 2. Land in an area that is designated as historic on the national register of historic places. 3. Land in an area that is designated historic by a local government. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "License" has the same meaning prescribed in section 9-831. 2. "Objective" means not influenced by personal interpretation, taste or feelings of a municipal employee and verifiable by reference to an adopted benchmark, standard or criterion available and knowable by the applicant or proponent. END_STATUTE